it: Design dell'impugnatura: Doppio grip; Esagonale; Nessun grip; Grip quadruplo; Solo bordo; Grip triplo; Altro
nl: Gripontwerp: Dubbele grip; Zeshoekig; Geen grip; Quad-grip; Alleen de rand; Tri-grip; Overig
th: ดีไซน์ด้ามจับ: กริปคู่; หกเหลี่ยม; ไม่มีกริป; กริปสี่ด้าน; ขอบเท่านั้น; กริปสามด้าน; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Design de aderência: Aderência dupla; Hexagonal; Sem aderência; Aderência quádrupla; Apenas aro; Aderência tripla; Outro
en: Grip design: Dual grip; Hexagonal; No grip; Quad grip; Rim only; Tri grip; Other
da: Grebsdesign: Dobbeltgreb; Sekskantet; Intet greb; Quad-greb; Kun kant; Tri-greb; Andet
es: Diseño de agarre: Doble agarre; Hexagonal; Sin agarre; Cuádruple agarre; Solo borde; Triple agarre; Otro
fr: Conception des prises: Adhérence double; Hexagonal; Sans adhérence; Adhérence quadruple; Rebord uniquement; Adhérence triple; Autre
tr: Kavrama tasarımı: Çift tutuş; Altıgen; Tutuş yok; Dörtlü tutuş; Sadece kenar; Üçlü tutuş; Diğer
fi: Otemuotoilu: Kaksoisote; Kuusikulmainen; Ei otekohdetta; Neloisote; Vain reuna; Kolmoisote; Muu
de: Griffdesign: Dual-Grip; Sechseckig; Kein Grip; Quad-Grip; Nur Rand; Tri-Grip; Sonstige
ja: グリップデザイン: デュアルグリップ; 六角形; グリップなし; クアッドグリップ; リムのみ; トライグリップ; その他
el: Σχεδιασμός λαβής: Διπλή λαβή; Εξαγωνικό; Χωρίς λαβή; Τετραπλή λαβή; Μόνο στεφάνη; Τριπλή λαβή; Άλλο
cs: Design úchytů: Dvojitý grip; Šestihranný; Bez gripu; Čtyřnásobný grip; Pouze obruč; Trojitý grip; Ostatní
nb: Grepdesign: Dobbelt grep; Sekskantet; Uten grep; Firedobbelt grep; Kun kant; Tredobbelt grep; Annet
ro-RO: Design prindere: Prindere dublă; Hexagonal; Fără prindere; Prindere cvadruplă; Doar margine; Prindere triplă; Altele
sk-SK: Dizajn rukoväte: Dvojitý grip; Šesťhranný; Bez gripu; Štvoritý grip; Iba po okraji; Trojitý grip; Iné
ru: Конструкция хвата: Двойной хват; Шестигранный; Без хвата; Четверной хват; Только обод; Тройной хват; Другое
hu: Markolat kialakítása: Kettős markolat; Hatszögletű; Nincs markolat; Négyes markolat; Csak perem; Hármas markolat; Egyéb
vi: Thiết kế tay cầm: Tay cầm kép; Lục giác; Không có tay cầm; Tay cầm bốn hướng; Chỉ có vành; Tay cầm ba hướng; Khác
zh-CN: 握把设计: 双孔握把; 六边形; 无握把; 四孔握把; 仅边缘; 三孔握把; 其他
lt-LT: Rankenos dizainas: Dvigubas suėmimas; Šešiakampis; Be suėmimo elementų; Keturigubas suėmimas; Tik lankas; Trigubas suėmimas; Kita
hr-HR: Dizajn drške: Dvostruki hvat (grip); Šesterokutno; Bez gripa; Četverostruki hvat; Samo obruč; Trostruki hvat; Ostalo
sv: Greppdesign: Dubbelgrepp; Sexkantig; Inget grepp; Fyrdubbelt grepp; Endast kant; Tregrepp; Övrigt
bg-BG: Дизайн на дръжката: Двоен захват; Шестоъгълен; Без захват; Четворен захват; Само на ръба; Троен захват; Друго
zh-TW: 握把設計: 雙重握把; 六角形; 無握把; 四重握把; 僅邊框; 三重握把; 其他
pt-BR: Pegada design: Grip duplo; Hexagonal; Sem grip; Grip quádruplo; Apenas borda; Grip triplo; Outro
ko: 그립 디자인: 듀얼 그립; 육각형; 그립 없음; 쿼드 그립; 림 전용; 트라이 그립; 기타
sl-SI: Zasnova ročaja: Dvojni oprijem; Šestkotni; Brez oprijema; Četverni oprijem; Samo na robu; Trojni oprijem; Drugo
pl: Konstrukcja uchwytu: Podwójny chwyt; Heksagonalny; Brak uchwytu; Poczwórny chwyt; Tylko obręcz; Potrójny chwyt; Inne